Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2201
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to:

(1) Promote kinship care and lifelong connections through the process of family finding when a child has been removed from the legal custody of the child's parents;

(2) Prevent recurrence of abuse, neglect, exploitation, or other maltreatment of children;

(3) Reduce the length of time children spend in foster care;

(4) Reduce multiple placements of children in foster care;

(5) Remain in compliance with the federal Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008, Public Law 110-351; and

(6) Create a pilot project for the process of locating and engaging family members in the life of a child who is a ward of the state or is participating in the bridge to independence program as defined in section 43-4503, or both, and in need of permanency through a lifelong network of support.

Laws 2015, LB243, § 1.